Utah statutes.
13-42-104.    Registration required.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), a provider may not provide debt-management services to an individual who it reasonably should know resides in this state at the time it agrees to provide the services, unless the provider is registered under this chapter.

(2)  If a provider is registered under this chapter, Subsection (1) does not apply to an employee or agent of the provider.

(3)  The administrator shall maintain and publicize a list of the names of all registered providers.

